Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 2. Arrest in Actions Founded on Contract

§ 3521.
Imprisonment for debt abolished.

No person shall be arrested or imprisoned on mesne process. No person shall be arrested or imprisoned on an execution or by other means to enforce a judgment in any civil action for money damages.
Notwithstanding the provisions herein, the court shall have full power to punish for contempt.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 96, eff. March 29, 1972;

1979, No. 67

, § 1, eff. date, see note set out below.

§§ 3522-3530.
Repealed.
1979, No. 67, § 9, eff. date, see note set out below.

§ 3531.
Repealed.
1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 111, eff. April 9, 1974.

§§ 3532,
3533.
Repealed.
1979, No. 67, § 9, eff. date, see note set out below.